District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.151

Scope of practice for real estate appraisers.

For the purposes of this part, the term “real estate appraiser” means any person who renders or offers to render professional services to persons, groups, or organizations in the act or process of estimating the value of real property and real estate.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
June 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-130, § 2(i), 53 DCR 4718

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.151.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-130 substituted “value of real property and real estate” for “value of real estate”.

Temporary Legislation

Section 2(j) of D.C. Law 16-101 substituted “real property and real estate” for “real estate”.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 16-101 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(j) of Non-Health Related Occupations and Professions Licensure Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-255, January 26, 2006, 53 DCR 763).